src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software ; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                     South Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !


!! # Adjective affixes

!! This is one of two parallel files containing adjective affixes.
!! The files represent two alternative interpretation of the same data
!! (South Saami adjectives).
!! This file is used for spellchecking, the alternative file
!! *adjectives-oahpa.lexc* is used for dictionary and icall applications.
!! This file is compiled by default, the other one is compiled by in
!! langs/sma giving the command *.configure --with-oahpa*
!! before compiling.


! ===========================================
! Adjectives: Adjectival inflection sublexica
! ===========================================

! Basic adjectival lexica, infl types
! -----------------------------------

!***** Adjektiver som skiller seg ut fra systemet****!



LEXICON R_RIEKTES_REAKTOE_RYOKTEHKE
 :ïekte  ATTR_0 ; ! MLK: tror stammen egentlig er ie, jfr: !riektiedidh, *riektiemdidh	1. ta en benvei; gjøre rettere, benere *geajnam riektiemdidh     ta en benvei; riektiemdidh doegkoe  (vi får) ta den korteste veien der over 2.
                  !      rette, beriktige (noens utsagn)
 :ååktehke PRED_0 ;
 :yöktehk  PRED_0 ;
 :ååktehk HKE_ODD_COMP ;
 :yöktehk HKE_ODD_COMP ;
! +Hom2:ïekte  ATTR_S ; ! egen entry, fordi lemma er rïektes, og da trenger vi ikke Hom-tagger
! +Hom2:ïekte PRED_S ; ! m/fölgende kasusböying, rïektese, rïektesem, rïektesen etc. jfr. rïektesem soptsestidh : sannhet,ekte, riktig - og da skulle det være mulig med rïektesåbpoe, rïektesommes = men det er ikke så mye brukt.
                      ! enten er det sant  eller ikke.
! +Hom2:eaktoe PRED_0 ; 


LEXICON JAEDTUVES
            :uves           ATTR_0    ;
       +Sg:               ÅERUVE_SG   ;
       +Pl:               ÅERUVE_PL   ;
                         ÅERUVE_ESS   ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:uve%^DISIMP    R          ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:uve%>%^DISIMPn R          ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:uv%>%^DISIMPi  R          ;
            :iev            ODDCOMP   ;

LEXICON VIELIEH
 :lieh ATTR_0 ;
 :lieh PRED_0 ;

!**SLUTT**Spesielle Adjektiver som skiller seg ut fra systemet**SLUTT**!

! VOKALUTVIDELSE på 2-stavelsesadjektiv, Fortsatt KLASSE1


! Attribute lexica
! ----------------

!LEXICON ATTR_0_PRED_0
!   ATTR_0 ;
!   PRED_0 ;

LEXICON ATTR_0
       ATTRCONT ;


LEXICON ATTR_0_ODD
      :e ATTRCONT ;
           ODDCOMP  ;
!          ODDCASEOBL ;  - predikativ: 'nahkeren' 'geeruvisnie' - i adv.og noun-fila

LEXICON EENSI
      :i  ATTRCONT ;
      :i  PRED_0 ; 
        :ig ODDCOMP  ;

LEXICON YÖLELH
      :h ATTRCONT ;
           ODDCOMP  ;

LEXICON ATTR_S
      :%>s ATTRCONT ;

LEXICON ATTR_H
     :%>h ATTRCONT ;

LEXICON ATTR_N
      :%>n ATTRCONT ;


LEXICON ATTRCONT
                           +Attr:       FINAL1     ;
                       +Cmp/Attr:       R          ;
          +Attr+Der2+Der/vuota+N:%»voet VUOTA_FLAG ;
!   +Attr+Der2+Der/vuota+N+Use/MT:%»voet VUOTA_FLAG ;
                           +Attr:        LAAKAN     ;

LEXICON VUOTA_FLAG
 @C.NeedNoun@ GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


! *Slutt* BARE ATTRIBUTTER  *Slutt* !

! Predicative lexica

! ------------------
LEXICON PRED_ije_ODDNOCOMP
+Sg+Nom:e    FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Acc:%>em FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:%>en FINAL1 ;


LEXICON PRED_S !!≈ ## `@CODE@`
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives Predicatives.
!! ```
 +Sg+Nom:%>s FINAL1 ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```

LEXICON PRED_0 !!≈ ## `@CODE@`
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives Predicatives.
!! ```
 +Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ; !!= @CODE@
! +N+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ; ?
!! ```

!Dele denne opp i ODD; EVEN
LEXICON PRED_H !!≈ ## `@CODE@`
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives Predicatives.
!! ```
 +Sg+Nom:%>h FINAL1 ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```


! denne skal også ut ! - --> intersatn om dette er en norsk suffiks egentlig?
LEXICON PRED_NE_ODD !!≈ ## `@CODE@`
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives Predicatives.
!! ```
 +Sg+Nom:%>ne FINAL1     ; !!= @CODE@
         :n     ODDCASEOBL ; !!= @CODE@
         :n     ODDCOMP    ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```

LEXICON PRED_N  !!≈ ## `@CODE@`
! - GENITIV
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives Predicatives.
!! ```
 +Sg+Nom:%>n FINAL1 ; !!= @CODE@
          :%>n PRED_0 ;
 ! MAJA : VUEP! Notat om denne egentlig er adverb - nomen i kasus, uten komparasjon er egentlig frosne kasuser og egentlig adv ;

!! ```

!LEXICON PRED_AN!!≈ !!!@CODE@  !
! The __@LEXNAME@__ lexicon is used for adjectives Predicatives.
! {{{
!   +Sg+Nom:%>an FINAL1 ; !!= @CODE@
!            :%>n adv ;
! }}}


    ! *SLUTT* BARE PRED-former  *SLUTT*   !



! *********************************************************************************************
! *** KLASSE 1, ie,oe,e og a-stammer med 1) attribut og prediaktiv -s, 2) uten attr/pred-s  ***
! *********************************************************************************************

LEXICON h_H_EVENNOCOMP
             ATTR_H ;
             PRED_H ;
 +Use/NG:ege PRED_0 ;

!Denne skal kanskje ikke plasseres under spesielle lexicons.


!D:1

LEXICON e_E_EVEN !!≈ ## `@CODE@`
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives on `–e` and `–e`  In attributes and predicatives.With EVEN-NOCOMP.
!! ```
    :e ATTR_0      ; !!= @CODE@
    :e PRED_0      ; !!= @CODE@
 +Sg:  NIEJTESGOBL ; !!= @CODE@
 +Pl:  NIEJTE_PL   ; !!= @CODE@
       NIEJTEREST  ; !!= @CODE@
    :e EVENCOMP    ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```

!D:1 E_stamme
LEXICON e_E_EVENNOCOMP1 !!≈ ## `@CODE@`
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives on `–e` and `–e` stem. In attributes and predicatives.With EVEN-NOCOMP.

!! ```
     :e ATTR_0      ; !!= @CODE@
     :e PRED_0      ; !!= @CODE@
  +Sg:  NIEJTESGOBL ; !!= @CODE@
! +Sg:  NIEJTESGOBL ; ! = @CODE@
  +Pl:  NIEJTE_PL   ; !!= @CODE@
        NIEJTEREST  ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```


!D:1  A_stamme
LEXICON a_A_EVEN1 !!≈ ## `@CODE@`
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives on `–a` and `–a`  In attributes and predicatives.With EVEN-COMP.
!! ```
    :a ATTR_0     ; !!= @CODE@
 +Sg:  MAANASGNOM ; !!= @CODE@
       MAANAOBL   ; !!= @CODE@
    :a EVENCOMP   ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```

LEXICON as_AS_EVEN1 !!≈ ## `@CODE@`
! Disse har opprinnelig vært as_a_EVEN_adjektiv
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives on `–as` and `–as`  In attributes and predicatives.With EVEN-COMP.
!! ```
            :a  ATTR_S   ; !!= @CODE@
!               MAANAOBL ;
!           :a  EVENCOMP ; ! Tidligere klasse-3
     +Sg+Nom:as FINAL1   ; !!= @CODE@
  +Cmp/SgNom:as R        ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```


!D:1
LEXICON ie_IE_EVEN1 !!≈ ## `@CODE@`
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives on `–ie` and `–ie`  In attributes and predicatives.With EVEN-COMP.
!! ```
 :ie ATTR_0     ; !!= @CODE@
     N_IE_FORMS ; !!= @CODE@
 :ie EVENCOMP   ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```


!D:1
LEXICON ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP !!≈ ## `@CODE@`
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives on `–ie` and `–ie`  In attributes and predicatives. With EVEN-COMP.
!! ```
 :ie ATTR_0     ; !!= @CODE@
     N_IE_FORMS ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```
