src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
stuarehke+A:stuarehke PRED_0 ;
tjoenehke+A:tjoenehke PRED_0 ;
bissemes+A:bisseme ATTR_S ;
båastoeh+A:båastoe ATTR_H ;
bårsije+A:bårsij PRED_ije_ODDNOCOMP ;
bæjjhkuktie+A:bæjjhkukt ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
dabtemes+A:dabteme ATTR_S ;
ecuadovre+A+OLang/NOB:ecuadovre ATTR_0 ;
eensi+v1+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:eens EENSI ; ! eensi- eensigåbpoe
eensi+v2+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ins EENSI ; ! + dyr og instr.
egyptiske+A:egyptisk e_E_EVEN ;
elyjsijumen+A+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB:elysijume ATTR_N ;
faali+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:faal EENSI ; !
finihte+A+OLang/NOB+Sem/Cat+Use/NotDNorm:finidt e_E_EVEN ;
frijje+A+OLang/NOB:frijj e_E_EVENNOCOMP1 ;
gaarkehtadtje+A:gaarkehtadtje PRED_0 ;
galhkuve+A:galhkuv ATTR_0_ODD ; ! avslutning, avsluttende attr.
gavva+A:gavv a_A_EVEN1 ;
gejhkie+A:gejhk ie_IE_EVEN1 ;
gieruve+A:gieruv ATTR_0_ODD ;
girvene+A:girve PRED_NE_ODD ;
gorredimmes+A:gorredimme ATTR_S ;
guatemaalan+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB:gu^atemaala ATTR_N ;
gurruve+A:gurruv ATTR_0_ODD ; ! tvunnet
gåajah+A:gåajah ATTR_0 ;
gåarvoehjuelkie+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gåarvoeh#juelk ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
gåetievielieh+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gåetievie VIELIEH ;
gåvva+A:gåvv a_A_EVEN1 ; !LMM gavva = gåvva
homogeene+A:homogee PRED_NE_ODD ;
homogeene+A+Err/Orth:homoge PRED_NE_ODD ;
hyölpeldh+A:hyölpeld ATTR_H ;
håakene+A:håake PRED_NE_ODD ; ! hååkene
hååkene+A:hååke PRED_NE_ODD ;
hïerves+A+Use/NG+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:hyörvehke PRED_0 ;
ihkuve+A:ihkuv ATTR_0_ODD ; !MLK+ går som "geeruve". Ihkuvisnie, ihkuvistie etc.
jaedtuves+A:jaedt JAEDTUVES ;
jaesiegoelkije+A:jaesie#goelkij PRED_ije_ODDNOCOMP ; !Nomen agentis
jealamadtje+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:jealamadtj e_E_EVEN ;
joekoen+A:joekoen ATTR_0 ; ! forelöpig slikt leksikalisert
klijmie+A:klijm ie_IE_EVEN1 ;
koreean+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB:koree^a ATTR_N ;
kruepie+A:kruep ie_IE_EVEN1 ;
kråavvoehjuelkie+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:kråavvoeh#juelk ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
kultuvrehistovrijeladtje+A:kultuvre#histovrije#ladtj e_E_EVENNOCOMP1 ; !hvor er denne fra?
laelije+A:laelij PRED_ije_ODDNOCOMP ; !Attr=laelije, Pred=ofte bare verbform, NOmen agentis
låhkije+A:låhkij PRED_ije_ODDNOCOMP ; ! Nomen agentis
lïemkes+A:lïemke ATTR_S ;
löökehtje+A:löökehtje ATTR_0 ; !Pred=Verb+löökie
maanavielieh+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:maanavie VIELIEH ;
maarhketjåelieh+A:maarhke#tjåe VIELIEH ; !I think this one goes as 'juelkie'
mïektjeldh+A:mïektjeld ATTR_H ;
nannoes+v2+A:nann as_AS_EVEN1 ;
njeeruve+A:njeeruv ATTR_0_ODD ; ! njeeruvisnie
njoetse+A:njoets e_E_EVEN ; ! e(1)-st.
nænnas+A:nænn as_AS_EVEN1 ; !Klasse 3
nöörjen+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:nöörje ATTR_N ;
onn-ohtje+A:onn-ohtj e_E_EVENNOCOMP1 ; !
orredaajreh+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:orre#daajre h_H_EVENNOCOMP ;
orretjalmh+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:orre#tjalm h_H_EVENNOCOMP ;
ovmessie+A:ov#mess ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ; ! this is set as typo in the typos doc, but common in text. This should really be written without hyphen (TO)
ovrïekte+A:ov#r R_RIEKTES_REAKTOE_RYOKTEHKE ;
pleasoevielieh+A:pleasoevie VIELIEH ; ! NORMATIVITY ISSUE - revehi-omsorgsfull
pliejhkie+A:pliejhk ie_IE_EVEN1 ;
rïekte+A:r R_RIEKTES_REAKTOE_RYOKTEHKE ;
seammoeh+A:seammoe ATTR_H ; ! siemmie - seamman (adverb)
sjilkehtimmes+A:sjilkehtimme ATTR_S ;
skoepenimmie+A:skoepenimmie ATTR_0 ;
skottlaanten+A+OLang/NOB:skottlaante ATTR_N ; !XXX
skråajhpa+A:skråajhp a_A_EVEN1 ; ! Maja+ tror denne er ah-an
slæjjan+A:slæjjan PRED_0 ;
spatnas+A:spatn as_AS_EVEN1 ; ! KB= DONT KNOW
suajas+A:suaj as_AS_EVEN1 ; ! suajebe- suajemes - ie-stamme!
såebrieruktie+A:såebrierukt ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ; !NOT GRADUATION
teeknihke+A:teeknihk e_E_EVENNOCOMP1 ; ! https://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Education:Norges_tekniske_høgskole
tekniske+A:teknisk e_E_EVEN ;
trieptjies+A:trieptjie ATTR_S ;
vaenie+A:vaen ie_IE_EVEN1 ; !vaenie-vaenebe-vaenemes corp
vearije+A:vearij PRED_ije_ODDNOCOMP ; ! 'trassig barn nå' vs. vearijes maana =som er slik permanent, har dette som permanent egenskap - Nomen agentis
viehkies+A:viehkies ATTR_0 ; ! SOUTH
yölelh+A:yölel YÖLELH ;
åtneldh+v1+A:åtneld ATTR_H "brukt" ;
induktijve+A:induktijv e_E_EVENNOCOMP1 ; 
kreajnas+A:kreajn as_AS_EVEN1 ; ! 
